Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-157
Determination by department.

The department may, when planning the placement of a child for adoption, determine whether the best interests of such child might be served by placing the child in an adoption involving exchange of information.

Laws 1988, LB 301, § 3.